src/krl-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +ProN +Num

! Verbal MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf +PrfIpf +HstPrf +PluPrf +HstPluPrf
+Ind +Imp +Cond +Opt
! Subject indices
+Sx1Sg +Sx2Sg +Sx3Sg 
+Sx1Du +Sx2Du +Sx3Du 
+Sx1Pl +Sx2Pl +Sx3Pl 
! Object indices
+Ox1Sg +Ox2Sg +Ox3Sg 
+Ox1Du +Ox2Du +Ox3Du 
+Ox1Pl +Ox2Pl +Ox3Pl 
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+Inf
+Pos +Neg

! Nominal MSP
! Number
+Sg +Pl
! Case
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Abl +Dat +Loc +Pros +Tra +Abe +Adc +Ins +Apr +Ine +Ill +Ela +Egr
+Prl +Ter1 +Ter2 +Ter3 +Add1 +Add2
+Apr1 +Apr2
+EssInst
+Ord
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Qst

+Appr
+Advc
+Ter
+Pro
+Car 

+Pers
+Dem

+PstI
+PstII

+Clt
!! Derivations
+Der/Ta
+Der/Te
+Der/ma
+Der/Tu
+Der/IA

%>
! Protoletters for xfst
%^DEVOICE
QAQ1 QAO1 EH1 QEQ1 INE1 ZD1 ZS1 V1
AO1 EI1 ZS1 ZD1  ! These are for developing underlying morphology rules
D1 E1 U1 

! Key lexicon

LEXICON Root
A ; 	! ../../tmp
Abbreviation ;                          ! abbr-olo-lex.txt
!ABBR ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/ABBR_olo-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
Acronym ;                               ! acro-olo-lex.txt
!ACRON ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/ACRON_olo-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
ADV ;
N ;
NUM ;
V ;
CONJ ;		! ../../tmp/out/CONJ_olo-lex.xml  
SUBJUNCTION ;
INTERJECTION ;
NUMERAL ;
PronRoot ;
POSTP ;         ! ../../tmp/out/POSTP_olo-lex.xml
PUNCTUATION ;



! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CcTag
+Cc: # ;
 
LEXICON CsTag
+Cs: # ;
 

LEXICON INTERJECTION 
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
+Num: # ;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
+Num: K;
+Num:%> CASESUF ;
+Num:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
+Ord:этӥ K;



LEXICON K
+Clt:%>ki # "also" ;
+Qst:а # ;
# ; 


LEXICON PUNCTUATION
#; 
LEXICON PoTag
+Po: # ; 

 
LEXICON AdvTag
+Adv: # ; 

LEXICON MannerTag
+Adv+Manner: K ;

LEXICON SpatTag
+Adv+Spat: K ;

LEXICON TempTag
+Adv+Temp: K ;

LEXICON CASESUF
#; 
LEXICON PRON
#; 
LEXICON DEM
#; 
LEXICON PERS
#; 
